test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AD_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲alad - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AD_STEM_2

     sg̲alad+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alíida
     sg̲alad+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alíidang
     sg̲alad+V+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲alíidan
     sg̲alad+V+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alíidang
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidang
     sg̲alad+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidanggang
     sg̲alad+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alíidangang
     sg̲alad+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidiinii
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidaangaan
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asa'áa
     sg̲alad+V+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asa'áang
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲alad+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲alad+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲alíid'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲alíid'ahlanggan
     sg̲alad+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alíid'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲alad+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲alíid'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲alíidaa'ahlang
     sg̲alad+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲alíidaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲alad+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲alíidaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+REFLEXIVE: sg̲alíid'ahl
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidang'waa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidang'waang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alíidang'waa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidang'anggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alíidang'angang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asaa'áng
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidang'ang'waa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alíidang'ang'waang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alíidang'ang'waa.ang
